apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="flyd/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/ede__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edt</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eder</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edes</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/idde__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idde</l>
          <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iddende</l>
          <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iddet</l>
          <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idder</l>
          <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/ide__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idende</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idt</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ider</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="v/ide__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idste</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ide</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idst</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éd</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/ige__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agde</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ige</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agt</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igende</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iger</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iges</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="skr/ige__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eg</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ige</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iger</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/igge__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>igge<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igge</l>
          <r>igge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iggende</l>
          <r>igge<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igget</l>
          <r>igge<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igger</l>
          <r>igge<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="st/ikke__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ak</l>
          <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ikke</l>
          <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ukket</l>
          <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ikker</l>
          <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="forsv/inde__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>andt</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>undne</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inde</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>undet</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inder</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="v/inde__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>andt</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ind</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inde</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indes</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indende</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>undet</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inder</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/inde__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>andt</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ind</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inde</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>undet</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inder</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/inde__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indende</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>undet</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tilbr/inge__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agte</l>
          <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agt</l>
          <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inger</l>
          <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <i>b</i>
        <par n="b/ede__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>b</i>
        <par n="b/ide__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>b</i>
        <par n="b/inde__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>f</i>
        <par n="f/inde__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>flyd</i>
        <par n="flyd/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>forsv</i>
        <par n="forsv/inde__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>l</i>
        <par n="l/igge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>s</i>
        <par n="s/idde__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>s</i>
        <par n="s/ige__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>skr</i>
        <par n="skr/ige__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>st</i>
        <par n="st/ikke__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>tilbr</i>
        <par n="tilbr/inge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>v</i>
        <par n="v/ide__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>v</i>
        <par n="v/inde__vblex"/>
      </e>
